Alaska statutes. Title 41. Public Resources.
Article 1. Protection of Forested Land.

Administrative Code. —

For forest fire protection, see 11 AAC 95, art. 6.

Collateral references. —

52 Am. Jur. 2d, Logs and Timber, §§ 61,62.

98 C.J.S., Woods and Forests, § 1 et seq.

Constitutionality of reforestation or forest conservation legislation. 13 ALR2d 1095.

Constitutionality of fire prevention provisions of forest conservation legislation. 13 ALR2d 1129.

Liability for spread of fire purposely and lawfully kindled. 24 ALR2d 241.

Measure of damages for destruction of or injury to fruit, nut, or other productive trees. 90 ALR3d 800.

Sec. 41.15.010.
Intent.

It is the intent of AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.170

to provide protection from wildland fire and other destructive agents, commensurate with the values at risk, on forested land that is owned privately, by the state, or by a municipality.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 88 SLA 1984; am § 3 ch 22 SLA 2008; am § 2 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, inserted “forested” preceding “land that is owned privately”. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.020.
Regulations.

The commissioner shall, by regulation, make provision for the protection of forested land in the state from fire and other destructive agents.

History.

(§ 2 ch 138 SLA 1961)

Administrative Code. —

For appeals, see 11 AAC 2.

For forest fire protection, see 11 AAC 95, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, substituted “division of forestry” for “division of lands” following “an employee of”, substituted “, when responding to a wildland fire or suspected wildland fire or administering the provisions of this chapter,” for “at any time” following “United States or the state may”, inserted “investigating,” following “purpose of preventing” near the end; added (b). Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.025.
Fire protection on mental health trust land.

Land that is in the mental health trust is, for the purpose of wild fire suppression, land owned by the state.

History.

(§ 14 ch 66 SLA 1991)

Sec. 41.15.030.
Contracts for forest protection; emergency firefighters.

The commissioner may enter into necessary protection contracts.

The commissioner may hire emergency firefighting personnel, and shall establish classifications and rates of pay for the emergency firefighting personnel consistent with the compensation paid by other firefighting agencies. The commissioner may adjust the classifications and rates based on findings of the federal Bureau of Land Management for Alaska. The commissioner may assign emergency firefighting personnel to conduct fire suppression, hazard reduction, fire prevention, habitat restoration or improvement, and other related activities in emergency and nonemergency circumstances. The assignment of emergency firefighting personnel to nonemergency activities may not be used to replace permanent or seasonal state employees.

History.

(§ 2 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 100 SLA 1976; am § 2 ch 88 SLA 1984; am § 2 ch 121 SLA 1996; am § 1 ch 10 SLA 2022)

Sec. 41.15.040.
Right of entry to control and suppress fires.

Upon approval by the commissioner or an authorized agent, an employee of the division of forestry, or of any organization authorized to prevent, control, or suppress a fire or a destructive agent, and others assisting in the control or suppression of a fire upon request of an officer or employee of the United States or the state may , when responding to a wildland fire or suspected wildland fire or administering the provisions of this chapter, enter upon any land, whether publicly or privately owned, for the purpose of preventing, investigating, suppressing, or controlling a wildland fire or a destructive agent.

A person may not interfere with or prohibit the access authorized under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 2 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 4 ch 22 SLA 2008; am §§ 3, 4 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments.

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, in (a), substituted “division of forestry” for “division of lands” following “an employee of”, substituted “, when responding to a wildland fire or suspected wildland fire or administering the provisions of this chapter,” for “at any time” following “United States or the state may”, inserted “investigating,” following “purpose of preventing,” near the end; added (b). Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.045.
Civil immunity.

Notwithstanding other provisions of law, a person may not bring a civil action for damages for death, personal injury, or property damage that results from an act or omission in performing or failing to perform activities or duties arising out of prevention, monitoring, control, or suppression of fires authorized to be performed under AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.170

against

the state or its officers, agents, and employees;

a political subdivision of the state or its officers, agents, and employees;

any organization authorized to prevent, control, or suppress fires; or

others assisting in the control or suppression of fires at the request of an officer or employee of the United States or the state.

This section does not apply to a civil action for damages as a result of intentional misconduct within the course and scope of employment or agency and with complete disregard for the safety and property of others.

History.

(§ 11 ch 43 SLA 2003)

Legislative history reports. —

For governor’s transmittal letter for
ch. 43, SLA 2003 (HB 245), which added this section, see 2003 House Journal 777—783.

Sec. 41.15.050.
Fire season.

The period from April 1 to August 31, inclusive, of each year is designated the fire season. The commissioner may, at any time, proclaim an additional period for all or any portion of the state when weather or other conditions require action for the protection of forested land. The commissioner may also, at any time, prohibit, or allow only by permit, the setting of fires, smoking, entry, or other use on the land, when, in the judgment of the commissioner, the activities would unduly increase the fire danger.

History.

(§ 3 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 27 SLA 1973; am § 1 ch 21 SLA 2006; am § 5 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For forest fire protection, see 11 AAC 95, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, deleted the former second sentence, which read, “The commissioner may designate other periods as fire season.”, in the second sentence, inserted “, at any time,” following “The commissioner may”, in the third sentence, substituted “at any time” for “during the fire season” following “The commissioner may also,”. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.060.
Permits.

The commissioner shall, by regulation, prescribe the conditions of and the manner for obtaining a permit for the setting of fires, use of burning devices, and other activities and uses of land that increase fire danger.

A person may not set fires, use burning devices, or conduct other activities or use land that increases fire danger without a permit as prescribed by the commissioner in regulation under (a) of this section.

History.

(§ 3 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 1 ch 179 SLA 1970; am §§ 6, 7 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Cross references. —

For classification of misdemeanors, see AS

11.81.250

; for penalties for misdemeanors, see AS

12.55.035

and

12.55.135

.

Administrative Code. —

For forest fire protection, see 11 AAC 95, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, in (a), substituted “for the setting of fires, use of burning devices, and other activities and uses of land that increase fire danger” for “failure to obtain the required permit, or violation of a condition of the permit is a misdemeanor” at the end; added (b). Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.070.
Disposal of burning materials.

During the fire season, a burn closure, or restriction established under AS

41.15.050

, a person may not discard any lighted tobacco, cigar, cigarette, match, firecracker, or other burning material on forested land.

History.

(§ 4 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 8 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, rewrote the section. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.080.
Equipment and notice required.

History.

[Repealed, § 23 ch 63 SLA 2018.]

Sec. 41.15.090.
Building or leaving fires.

A person may not start a fire in or near forested land without first clearing the ground immediately around it free from materials that will carry fire.

A person who starts a fire in or near forested land may not leave the fire before totally extinguishing the fire.

History.

(§ 6 ch 138 SLA 1961; am §§ 9, 10 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Administrative Code. —

For forest fire protection, see 11 AAC 95, art. 6.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, rewrote (a), added (b). Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.100.
Setting fires without consent.

A person may not set on fire forested land or other inflammable material located or growing on land that is not owned, possessed, or controlled by the person, without the consent of the owner or lawful occupant of the land.

History.

(§ 7 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 11 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, substituted “A person may not set on fire forested land” for “A person who sets on fire timber, brush, grass,” at the beginning, and deleted “, guilty of a misdemeanor” at the end. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.110.
Uncontrolled spread of fire; leaving fire unattended.

A person who knows of a fire or sets a fire on forested land owned, possessed, or controlled by the person, shall exercise due care to prevent the uncontrolled spread of the fire.

A person shall make every effort possible to extinguish a fire the person knowingly sets on forested land and may not leave a fire unattended.

In a criminal action brought under this section, the escape of the fire may be considered by a court as evidence that the person responsible for starting the fire acted knowingly.

History.

(§ 8 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 2 ch 179 SLA 1970; am § 12 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, in (a), deleted the second sentence, which read, “A person failing to exercise due care which results in spread of the fire and damage to property of another is guilty of a misdemeanor.”; rewrote (b), which read, “A person who neglects to make every effort possible to extinguish a fire the person knowingly sets on forested land or who leaves such a fire unattended is guilty of a misdemeanor”; rewrote (c), which read, “In a criminal action brought under this section, the escape of the fire is presumptive evidence of negligence by the person responsible for starting the fire and unless rebutted is sufficient to sustain a conviction.” Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.120.
Failure to assist in preventing or suppressing fires.

If an officer or employee of the United States or the state who is authorized to prevent, investigate, or suppress fires requests a person to assist in the prevention or suppression of a fire and informs the person of the officer or employee’s official status, the person shall assist the officer or employee.

History.

(§ 9 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 13 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, inserted “, investigate,” following “authorized to prevent”, substituted “the person shall assist the officer or employee” for “and the person fails to assist the officer or employee in the performance of duties, the person is guilty of a misdemeanor” at the end. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.130.
Backfires and burnouts excluded.

AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.040

and

41.15.050

—

41.15.170

do not apply to the setting of backfires, burnouts, and other burning or clearing of land under the direction of an officer or employee of the United States or the state who is authorized to prevent or suppress fires.

History.

(§ 9 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 14 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, substituted “AS

41.15.010

–

41.15.040

and

41.15.050

–

41.15.170

” for “AS

41.15.010

–

41.15.170

” at the beginning, and “backfires, burnouts, and other burning or clearing of land” for “a backfire” following “the setting of”. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.140.
Penalty.

Except as provided in AS

41.15.150

, a person who

knowingly violates a provision of AS

41.15.040

—

41.15.130

is guilty of a class A misdemeanor punishable as provided in AS 12.55;

without any culpable mental state, violates a provision of AS

41.15.040

—

41.15.130

or a regulation adopted under AS

41.15.040

—

41.15.130

is guilty of a violation and upon conviction is punishable by a fine under AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 10 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 15 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, rewrote the section. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.150.
Criminal burning of forested land in the first degree.

A person commits the crime of criminal burning of forested land in the first degree if

the person violates AS

41.15.155

; and

the person’s actions or conduct violate a provision of AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.130

or a regulation adopted under AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.130

.

Criminal burning of forested land in the first degree is a class B felony punishable as provided in AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 11 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 16 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, rewrote the section. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.155.
Criminal burning of forested land in the second degree.

A person commits the crime of criminal burning of forested land in the second degree if

the person knowingly sets a fire;

with criminal negligence, the person

permits the fire to spread beyond the person’s control; or

fails to prevent the fire from spreading to forested land or other flammable material; and

as a result, the fire burns forested land or other flammable material located or growing on land that is not owned, possessed, or controlled by the person.

Criminal burning of forested land in the second degree is a class C felony punishable as provided in AS 12.55.

History.

(§ 17 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effective dates. —

Section 27,
ch. 63, SLA 2018 makes this section effective July 1, 2018.

Sec. 41.15.160.
Double damages in civil actions.

In addition to the criminal punishment provided for by AS

11.46.400

—

11.46.450

, AS

41.15.140

,

41.15.150

, and

41.15.155

, the United States, the state, a municipality, or any person may recover in a civil action double the amount of damages sustained as a consequence of a violation of AS

11.46.400

—

11.46.450

, AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.155

. In a civil action brought under AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.170

or any other law relating to the subject matter of AS 41.15.010 —

41.15.170

, the escape of a fire is presumptive evidence of negligence by the person responsible for starting the fire and unless rebutted is sufficient to sustain the recovery.

History.

(§ 12 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 18 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, in the first sentence, substituted “AS

11.46.400

—

11.46.450

, AS

41.15.140

,

41.15.150

, and

41.15.155

” for “AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.170

” following “provided for by”, and “AS

11.46.400

—

11.46.450

, AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.155

” for “AS 41.15.010” for “AS 41.15.010 —

41.15.170

” following “a violation of”. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.

Sec. 41.15.170.
Definitions.

In AS

41.15.010

—

41.15.170

,

“criminal negligence” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“damages” includes costs incurred in suppressing, controlling, or extinguishing a fire;

“destructive agent” means an insect, pathogen, or other environmental agent that causes damage to a forest resource;

“forested land” includes all land on which grass, brush, timber, and other natural vegetative material grows;

“knowingly” has the meaning given in AS

11.81.900

;

“wildland fire” includes the uncontrolled burning of grass, brush, timber, and other natural vegetative material.

History.

(§ 1 ch 138 SLA 1961; am § 3 ch 179 SLA 1970; am § 43 ch 85 SLA 1988; am § 5 ch 22 SLA 2008; am § 19 ch 63 SLA 2018)

Revisor’s notes. —

In 1983 and 2018, this section was reorganized to place the terms defined in alphabetical order.

Effect of amendments. —

The 2018 amendment, effective July 21, 2018, added (5) [now (1)] and (6) [now (5)]. Although the 2018 amendment was to have taken effect July 1, 2018, under sec. 27, ch. 63, SLA 2018, the governor did not sign the bill until July 20, 2018, and so the actual effective date of the amendment was July 21, 2018, under AS

01.10.070(d)

.